Washington statutes.
RCW 9.73.270

Collecting, using electronic data or metadata—Cell site simulator devices—Requirements.

The state and its political subdivisions shall not, by means of a cell site simulator device, collect or use a person's electronic data or metadata without (1) that person's informed consent, (2) a warrant, based upon probable cause, that describes with particularity the person, place, or thing to be searched or seized, or (3) acting in accordance with a legally recognized exception to the warrant requirements.

[ 2015 c 222 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 222: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 11, 2015]." [ 2015 c 222 s 4.]